Mississippi, session 2026, HB1192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 37-15-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-15-31.  (1)  (a)  Except as provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section, upon the * * *petition receipt of notice in writing * * *of from a parent or guardian resident of the school district of an individual student filed or lodged with the president or secretary of the school board of a school district in which the pupil has been enrolled or is qualified to be enrolled as a student under Section 37-15-9, * * *or upon the aforesaid petition or the initiative of the school board of a school district as to the transfer of a grade or grades, individual students living in one school district * * *or a grade or grades of a school within the districts may be legally transferred to another school district * * *, by the mutual consent of the school boards of all school districts concerned, which consent must be given in writing and spread upon the minutes of such boards. (b)  * * *The school board of the transferring school district to which such petition may be addressed shall act thereon not later than its next regular meeting subsequent to the filing or lodging of the petition, and a failure to act within that time shall constitute a rejection of such request.  The school board of the * * * other transferee school district * * *involved (the transferee board) shall act on * * *such a parent or guardian's request for transfer as soon as possible * * *after the transferor board shall have approved or rejected such transfer and no later than the next regular meeting of the transferee board, and a failure of such transferee board to act within such time shall constitute a rejection of such request.  If such a transfer is approved by the transferee board, then such decision shall be final.  * * *If such a transfer should be refused by the school board of either school district, then such decision shall be final. (c)  Any legal guardianship formed for the purpose of establishing residency for school district attendance purposes shall not be recognized by the affected school board. (2)  (a)  Upon the * * *petition receipt of notice in writing * * *of from any parent or guardian who is a resident of Mississippi and is an instructional or licensed employee of a school district, but not a resident of such district, the school board of the employer school district shall consent to the transfer of such employee's dependent school-age children to its district and shall spread the same upon the minutes of the board.  Upon the * * *petition receipt of notice in writing * * *of from any parent or guardian who is not a resident of Mississippi and who is an instructional or licensed employee of a school district in Mississippi, the school board of the employer school district shall consent to the transfer of such employee's dependent school-age children to its district and shall spread the same upon the minutes of the board. (b)  The school board of any school district, in its discretion, may adopt a uniform policy to allow the enrollment and attendance of the dependent children of noninstructional and nonlicensed employees, who are residents of Mississippi but are not residents of their district.  Such policy shall be based upon the employment needs of the district, implemented according to job classification groups and renewed each school year. (c)  The employer transferee school district shall notify in writing the school district from which the pupil or pupils are transferring, and the school board of the transferor school district shall spread the same upon its minutes. (d)  * * *Any such agreement by The school boards * * *for involved in the legal transfer of a student pursuant to this subsection shall * * *include a provision enter an agreement providing for the transportation of the student.  In the absence of such * * *provision an agreement, the responsibility for transporting the student to the transferee school district shall be that of the parent or guardian. (e)  Any school district which accepts a student under the provisions of this subsection shall not assess any tuition fees upon such transferring student in accordance with the provisions of Section 37-19-27. (3)  Upon the * * *petition request in writing * * *of from any parent or legal guardian of a school-age child who is a resident of an adjacent school district residing in the geographical situation described in Section 37-15-29(3), the school board of the school district operating the school located in closer proximity to the residence of the child shall consent to the transfer of the child to its district, and shall spread the same upon the minutes of the board.  * * *Any such agreement by The school boards * * *for involved in the legal transfer of a student under this subsection shall * * *include a provision enter an agreement providing for the transportation of the student by either the transferor or the transferee school district.  * * *In the event that either the school board of the transferee or the transferor school district shall object to the transfer, it shall have the right to appeal to the State Board of Education whose decision shall be final.  However, If the school boards * * *agreeing on the legal transfer of any student shall fail to agree on which district shall provide transportation, the responsibility for transporting the student to the transferee school district shall be that of the parent or guardian. (4)  * * *Upon the petition in writing of any parent or legal guardian of a school‑age child who was lawfully transferred to another school district prior to July 1, 1992, as described in Section 37‑15‑29(4), the school board of the transferee school district shall consent to the transfer of such child and the transfer of any school‑age brother and sister of such child to its district, and shall spread the same upon the minutes of the board. [DELETED] (5)  (a)  If the board of trustees of a municipal separate school district with added territory does not have a member who is a resident of the added territory outside the corporate limits, upon the * * *petition request in writing * * *of from any parent or legal guardian of a school-age child who is a resident of the added territory outside the corporate limits, the * * *board of trustees of the municipal separate school district and the school board of the school district adjacent to the added territory shall consent to the transfer of the child from the municipal separate school district to the adjacent school district.  The * * *agreement transfer must be spread upon the minutes of the board of trustees of the municipal separate school district and the school board of the adjacent school district.  The school boards of the involved school districts shall enter an agreement * * *must provide providing for the transportation of the student.  In the absence of such * * *a provision an agreement, the parent or legal guardian shall be responsible for transporting the student to the adjacent school district.  Any school district that accepts a student under this subsection may not assess any tuition fees against the transferring student. (b)  Before September 1 of each year, the board of trustees of the municipal separate school district shall certify to the State Department of Education the number of students in the added territory of the municipal separate school district who are transferred to the adjacent school district under this subsection.  The municipal separate school district also shall certify the total number of students in the school district residing in the added territory plus the number of those students who are transferred to the adjacent school district.  Based upon these figures, the department shall calculate the percentage of the total number of students in the added territory who are transferred to the adjacent school district and shall certify this percentage to the levying authority for the municipal separate school district.  The levying authority shall remit to the school board of the adjacent school district, from the proceeds of the ad valorem taxes collected for the support of the municipal separate school district from the added territory of the municipal separate school district, an amount equal to the percentage of the total number of students in the added territory who are transferred to the adjacent school district. SECTION 2.  Section 37-15-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-15-29.  (1)  Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), (4) and (5) of this section, no minor child may enroll in or attend any school except in the school district of his residence, unless such child be lawfully transferred from the school district of his residence to a school in another school district in accord with the statutes of this state now in effect or which may be hereafter enacted. (2)  Those children whose parent(s) or legal guardian(s) are instructional personnel or certificated employees of a school district may at such employee's discretion enroll and attend the school or schools of their parent's or legal guardian's employment regardless of the residence of the child. (3)  No child shall be required to be transported in excess of thirty (30) miles on a school bus from his or her home to school, or in excess of thirty (30) miles from school to his or her home, if there is another school in an adjacent school district located on a shorter school bus transportation route by the nearest traveled road. Those children residing in such geographical situations may, at the discretion of their parent(s) or legal guardian(s), enroll and attend the nearer school, regardless of the residence of the child.  In the event the parent or legal guardian of such child and the school board are unable to agree on the school bus mileage required to transport the child from his or her home to school, an appeal shall lie to the State Board of Education, or its designee, whose decision shall be final.  The school districts involved in the appeal shall provide the Mississippi Department of Education with any school bus route information requested, including riding the buses as necessary, in order to measure the bus routes in question, as needed by the State Board of Education in considering the appeal. (4)  Those children lawfully transferred from the school district of his residence to a school in another school district prior to July 1, 1992, may, at the discretion of their parent(s) or legal guardian(s), continue to enroll and attend school in the transferee school district.  Provided further, that the brother(s) and sister(s) of said children lawfully transferred prior to July 1, 1992, may also, at the discretion of their parent(s) or legal guardian(s), enroll and attend school in the transferee school district. (5)  (a)  Those children whose parent(s) or legal guardian(s) are active duty, or Active Guard and Reserve duty, members of the United States Armed Forces, but not those who are performing inactive duty training, may, at the discretion of their parent(s) or legal guardian(s), enroll and attend the school district and school campus of their parent's or legal guardian's choosing, regardless of the residence of the child. (b)  Those children whose parent(s) or legal guardian(s) are civilian military personnel and reside on a military base  may, at the discretion of their parent(s) or legal guardian(s), enroll and attend the school district and school campus of their parent's or legal guardian's choosing, regardless of the residence of the child. (c)  For purposes of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (5): (i)  A school district is not required to provide transportation to a student who enrolls in or transfers to another school district or school campus within the district of chosen attendance; (ii)  A student eligible for enrollment or transfer shall be allowed only one (1) school transfer per academic year; (iii)  Once admitted, and unless expelled, the parent(s) or legal guardian(s) of students transferring under the authority of this subsection shall not be required to reapply for admission for continued enrollment in the school district or school campus of last attendance for any subsequent years of attendance therein; and (iv)  If the school district is unable to accommodate a request for enrollment for transfer due to a lack of capacity to accept the student in to the district or a specific school campus, the school board shall deny the request and spread the same upon its minutes. (d)  (i)  As used in this subsection (5), "active duty" means full-time duty in the active military service of the United States. (ii)  As used in this subsection (5), "Active Guard and Reserve duty" means active duty or full-time National Guard duty performed by a member of a reserve component of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force or Marine Corps, which is pursuant to an order to active duty or full-time National Guard duty for a period of one hundred eighty (180) consecutive days or more. (iii)  Before enrolling his or her child in the selected school of choice, the service member shall provide the school of enrollment with a copy of his or her Department of Defense photo identification, and a "Statement of Service" from the installation adjutant general or official letter from a commander above the Lieutenant Colonel rank signifying that the service member is on active duty, or Active Guard and Reserve duty, assignment or has been mobilized within the state. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.